Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3528
Act, how cited.

Sections 23-3528 to 23-3552 may be cited as the Nebraska Local Hospital District Act.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 28, p. 384;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.47.